Nebraska, session 109, LB568.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 37-112, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
37-112 The Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Cash Fund is created
for the purpose of funding the program set forth in section 37-111. The
fund shall consist of any money credited to the fund pursuant to section
15 of this act 60-3,258. The fund may also receive gifts, bequests,
grants, or other contributions or donations from public or private
entities. The state investment officer shall invest any money in the fund
available for investment pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 2. Section 37-327.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
37-327.04 The Game and Parks Commission Educational Fund is created.
The fund shall consist of money credited pursuant to section 15 of this
act 60-3,227 and any other money as determined by the Legislature. The
commission shall use the fund to provide youth education programs
relating to wildlife conservation practices. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 3. Section 37-811, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
37-811 There is hereby created the Wildlife Conservation Fund. The
fund shall be used to assist in carrying out the Nongame and Endangered
Species Conservation Act, to pay for research into and management of the
ecological effects of the release, importation, commercial exploitation,
and exportation of wildlife species pursuant to section 37-548, and to
pay any expenses incurred by the Department of Revenue or any other
agency in the administration of the income tax designation program
required by section 77-27,119.01. The fund shall consist of money
credited pursuant to section 15 of this act 60-3,238 and any other money
-2-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
as determined by the Legislature. The fund shall also consist of money
transferred from the General Fund by the State Treasurer in an amount to
be determined by the Tax Commissioner that which shall be equal to the
total amount of contributions designated pursuant to section
77-27,119.01. Any money in the Wildlife Conservation Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 4. Section 60-301, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-301 Sections 60-301 to 60-3,236 and sections 13, 14, and 15 of
this act 60-3,260 shall be known and may be cited as the Motor Vehicle
Registration Act.
Sec. 5. Section 60-393, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-393 Any owner who has two or more motor vehicles or trailers
required to be registered under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act may
register all such motor vehicles or trailers on a calendar-year basis or
on an annual basis for the same registration period beginning in a month
chosen by the owner. When electing to establish the same registration
period for all such motor vehicles or trailers, the owner shall pay the
registration fee, the motor vehicle tax imposed in section 60-3,185, the
motor vehicle fee imposed in section 60-3,190, and the alternative fuel
fee imposed in section 60-3,191 on each motor vehicle for the number of
months necessary to extend its current registration period to the
registration period under which all such motor vehicles or trailers will
be registered. Credit shall be given for registration paid on each motor
vehicle or trailer when the motor vehicle or trailer has a later
expiration date than that chosen by the owner except as otherwise
provided in sections 60-3,121, 60-3,122.02, 60-3,122.04, and sections 14
and 15 of this act 60-3,128, 60-3,224, 60-3,227, 60-3,233, 60-3,235,
-3-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
60-3,238, 60-3,240, 60-3,242, 60-3,244, 60-3,246, 60-3,248, 60-3,250,
60-3,252, 60-3,254, 60-3,256, 60-3,258, and 60-3,260. Thereafter all such
motor vehicles or trailers shall be registered on an annual basis
starting in the month chosen by the owner.
Sec. 6. Section 60-395, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-395 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section and sections 60-3,121, 60-3,122.02, 60-3,122.04, and sections 14
and 15 of this act 60-3,128, 60-3,224, 60-3,227, 60-3,231, 60-3,233,
60-3,235, 60-3,238, 60-3,240, 60-3,242, 60-3,244, 60-3,246, 60-3,248,
60-3,250, 60-3,252, 60-3,254, 60-3,256, 60-3,258, and 60-3,260, the
registration shall expire and the registered owner or lessee may, by
returning the registration certificate, the license plates, and, when
appropriate, the validation decals and by either making application on a
form prescribed by the department to the county treasurer of the
occurrence of an event described in subdivisions (a) through (e) of this
subsection or, in the case of a change in situs, displaying to the county
treasurer the registration certificate of such other state as evidence of
a change in situs, receive a refund of that part of the unused fees and
taxes on motor vehicles or trailers based on the number of unexpired
months remaining in the registration period from the date of any of the
following events:
(a) Upon transfer of ownership of any motor vehicle or trailer;
(b) In case of loss of possession because of fire, natural disaster,
theft, dismantlement, or junking;
(c) When a salvage branded certificate of title is issued;
(d) Whenever a type or class of motor vehicle or trailer previously
registered is subsequently declared by legislative act or court decision
to be illegal or ineligible to be operated or towed on the public roads
and no longer subject to registration fees, the motor vehicle tax imposed
in section 60-3,185, the motor vehicle fee imposed in section 60-3,190,
-4-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
and the alternative fuel fee imposed in section 60-3,191;
(e) Upon a trade-in or surrender of a motor vehicle under a lease;
or
(f) In case of a change in the situs of a motor vehicle or trailer
to a location outside of this state.
(2) If the date of the event falls within the same calendar month in
which the motor vehicle or trailer is acquired, no refund shall be
allowed for such month.
(3) If the transferor or lessee acquires another motor vehicle at
the time of the transfer, trade-in, or surrender, the transferor or
lessee shall have the credit provided for in this section applied toward
payment of the motor vehicle fees and taxes owed by such transferor or
lessee at the time of such transfer, trade-in, or surrender then owing.
Otherwise, the transferor or lessee shall file a claim for refund with
the county treasurer upon an application form prescribed by the
department.
(4) The registered owner or lessee shall make a claim for refund or
credit of the fees and taxes for the unexpired months in the registration
period within sixty days after the date of the event or shall be deemed
to have forfeited the his or her right to such refund or credit.
(5) For purposes of this section, the date of the event shall be:
(a) In the case of a transfer or loss, the date of the transfer or loss;
(b) in the case of a change in the situs, the date of registration in
another state; (c) in the case of a trade-in or surrender under a lease,
the date of trade-in or surrender; (d) in the case of a legislative act,
the effective date of the act; and (e) in the case of a court decision,
the date the decision is rendered.
(6) Application for registration or for reassignment of license
plates and, when appropriate, validation decals to another motor vehicle
or trailer shall be made within thirty days of the date of purchase.
(7) If a motor vehicle or trailer was reported stolen under section
-5-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
60-178, a refund under this section shall not be reduced for a lost
license plate charge and a credit under this section may be reduced for a
lost license plate charge but the applicant shall not be required to pay
the license plate fee for new license plates.
(8) The county treasurer shall refund the motor vehicle fee and
registration fee from the fees that which have not been transferred to
the State Treasurer. The county treasurer shall make payment to the
claimant from the undistributed motor vehicle taxes of the taxing unit
where the tax money was originally distributed. No refund of less than
two dollars shall be paid.
Sec. 7. Section 60-396, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-396 Whenever the registered owner files an application with the
county treasurer showing that a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is
disabled and has been removed from service, the registered owner may, by
returning the registration certificate, the license plates, and, when
appropriate, the validation decals or, in the case of the unavailability
of such registration certificate or certificates, license plates, or
validation decals, then by making an affidavit to the county treasurer of
such disablement and removal from service, receive a credit for a portion
of the registration fee from the fee deposited with the State Treasurer
at the time of registration based upon the number of unexpired months
remaining in the registration year except as otherwise provided in
sections 60-3,121, 60-3,122.02, 60-3,122.04, and sections 14 and 15 of
this act 60-3,128, 60-3,224, 60-3,227, 60-3,233, 60-3,235, 60-3,238,
60-3,240, 60-3,242, 60-3,244, 60-3,246, 60-3,248, 60-3,250, 60-3,252,
60-3,254, 60-3,256, 60-3,258, and 60-3,260. The owner shall also receive
a credit for the unused portion of the motor vehicle tax and fee based
upon the number of unexpired months remaining in the registration year.
When the owner registers a replacement motor vehicle, trailer, or
semitrailer at the time of filing such affidavit, the credit may be
-6-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
immediately applied against the registration fee and the motor vehicle
tax and fee for the replacement motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer.
When no such replacement motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is so
registered, the county treasurer shall determine the amount, if any, of
the allowable credit for the registration fee and the motor vehicle tax
and fee and issue a credit certificate to the owner. When such motor
vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is removed from service within the same
month in which it was registered, no credits shall be allowed for such
month. The credits may be applied against taxes and fees for new or
replacement motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers incurred within one
year after cancellation of registration of the motor vehicle, trailer, or
semitrailer for which the credits were allowed. When any such motor
vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is reregistered within the same
registration year in which its registration has been canceled, the taxes
and fees shall be that portion of the registration fee and the motor
vehicle tax and fee for the remainder of the registration year.
Sec. 8. Section 60-3,104, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,104 The department shall issue the following types of license
plates:
(1) Alternate license plates issued pursuant to sections 13, 14, and
15 of this act;
(2) (1) Amateur radio station license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,126;
(3) (2) Apportionable vehicle license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,203;
(4) (3) Autocycle license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,100;
(5) (4) Boat dealer license plates issued pursuant to section
60-379;
(5) Breast Cancer Awareness Plates issued pursuant to sections
-7-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
60-3,230 and 60-3,231;
(6) Bus license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,144;
(7) Choose Life License Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,232
and 60-3,233;
(7) (8) Commercial motor vehicle license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,147;
(9) Czech Heritage Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,259 and
60-3,260;
(8) (10) Dealer or manufacturer license plates issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,114 and 60-3,115;
(9) (11) Disabled veteran license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,124;
(12) Donate Life Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,245 and
60-3,246;
(13) Down Syndrome Awareness Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,247 and 60-3,248;
(10) (14) Farm trailer license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,151;
(11) (15) Farm truck license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,146;
(12) (16) Farm trucks with a gross weight of over sixteen tons
license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,146;
(13) (17) Fertilizer trailer license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,151;
(14) (18) Former military vehicle license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,236;
(15) (19) Gold Star Family license plates issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,122.01 and 60-3,122.02;
(16) (20) Handicapped or disabled person license plates issued
pursuant to section 60-3,113;
(17) (21) Historical vehicle license plates issued pursuant to
-8-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
sections 60-3,130 to 60-3,134;
(22) Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,258;
(18) (23) Local truck license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,145;
(19) (24) Metropolitan utilities district license plates issued
pursuant to section 60-3,228;
(20) (25) Military Honor Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,122.03 and 60-3,122.04;
(21) (26) Minitruck license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,100;
(22) (27) Motor vehicle license plates for motor vehicles owned or
operated by the state, counties, municipalities, or school districts
issued pursuant to section 60-3,105;
(23) (28) Motor vehicles exempt pursuant to section 60-3,107;
(24) (29) Motorcycle license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,100;
(30) Mountain Lion Conservation Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,226 and 60-3,227;
(31) Native American Cultural Awareness and History Plates issued
pursuant to sections 60-3,234 and 60-3,235;
(32) Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,127 to 60-3,129;
(33) Nebraska History Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,255
and 60-3,256;
(34) Nebraska 150 Sesquicentennial Plates issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,223 to 60-3,225;
(25) (35) Nonresident owner thirty-day license plates issued
pursuant to section 60-382;
(26) Organizational license plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,104.01 and 60-3,104.02;
-9-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
(27) (36) Passenger car having a seating capacity of ten persons or
less and not used for hire issued pursuant to section 60-3,143 other than
autocycles;
(28) (37) Passenger car having a seating capacity of ten persons or
less and used for hire issued pursuant to section 60-3,143 other than
autocycles;
(29) (38) Pearl Harbor license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,122;
(30) (39) Personal-use dealer license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,116;
(31) (40) Personalized message license plates for motor vehicles,
trailers, and semitrailers, except motor vehicles, trailers, and
semitrailers registered under section 60-3,198, issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,118 to 60-3,121;
(41) Pets for Vets Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,249 and
60-3,250;
(32) (42) Prisoner-of-war license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,123;
(43) Prostate Cancer Awareness Plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,240;
(33) (44) Public power district license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,228;
(34) (45) Purple Heart license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,125;
(35) (46) Recreational vehicle license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,151;
(36) (47) Repossession license plates issued pursuant to section
60-375;
(48) Sammy's Superheroes license plates for childhood cancer
awareness issued pursuant to section 60-3,242;
(37) (49) Special interest motor vehicle license plates issued
-10-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
pursuant to section 60-3,135.01;
(50) Specialty license plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,104.01 and 60-3,104.02;
(51) Support the Arts Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,251
and 60-3,252;
(52) Support Our Troops Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,243
and 60-3,244;
(53) The Good Life Is Outside Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,253 and 60-3,254;
(38) (54) Trailer license plates issued for trailers owned or
operated by the state, counties, municipalities, or school districts
issued pursuant to section 60-3,106;
(39) (55) Trailer license plates issued for trailers owned or
operated by a metropolitan utilities district or public power district
pursuant to section 60-3,228;
(40) (56) Trailer license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,100;
(41) (57) Trailers exempt pursuant to section 60-3,108;
(42) (58) Transporter license plates issued pursuant to section
60-378;
(43) (59) Trucks or combinations of trucks, truck-tractors, or
trailers that which are not for hire and engaged in soil and water
conservation work and used for the purpose of transporting pipe and
equipment exclusively used by such contractors for soil and water
conservation construction license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,149;
(44) (60) Utility trailer license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,151; and
(45) (61) Well-boring apparatus and well-servicing equipment license
plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,109. ; and
(62) Wildlife Conservation Plates issued pursuant to section
-11-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
60-3,238.
Sec. 9. Section 60-3,104.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-3,104.01 (1) A person may apply for organizational specialty
license plates in lieu of regular license plates on an application
prescribed and provided by the department pursuant to section 60-3,104.02
for any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, except for motor vehicles
or trailers registered under section 60-3,198. An applicant receiving an
organizational a specialty license plate for a farm truck with a gross
weight of over sixteen tons or for a commercial motor vehicle registered
for a gross weight of five tons or over shall affix the appropriate
tonnage decal to the license plate. The department shall make forms
available for such applications. Each application for initial issuance or
renewal of organizational specialty license plates shall be accompanied
by a fee of seventy dollars. Fees collected pursuant to this subsection
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall
credit sixty percent of the fee for initial issuance and renewal of
organizational specialty license plates to the Department of Motor
Vehicles Cash Fund and forty percent of the fee to the Highway Trust
Fund.
(2)(a) When the department receives an application for
organizational specialty license plates, the department may deliver the
license plates and registration certificate to the applicant by United
States mail or to the county treasurer of the county where in which the
motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is registered and the delivery of
the license plates and registration certificate shall be made through a
secure process and system. If Beginning on an implementation date
designated by the director on or before January 1, 2022, if delivery of
the license plates and registration certificate is made by the department
to the applicant, the department may charge a postage and handling fee in
an amount not more than necessary to recover the cost of postage and
-12-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
handling for the specific items mailed to the registrant. The department
shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department
of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. The county treasurer or the department shall
issue organizational specialty license plates in lieu of a regular
license plate plates when the applicant complies with the other
provisions of law for registration of the motor vehicle, trailer, or
semitrailer. If organizational specialty license plates are lost, stolen,
or mutilated, the licensee shall be issued replacement license plates
pursuant to section 60-3,157.
(b) The county treasurer or the department may issue temporary
license stickers to the applicant under this section for the applicant to
lawfully operate the vehicle pending receipt of the license plates. No
charge in addition to the registration fee shall be made for the issuance
of a temporary license sticker under this subdivision. The department
shall furnish temporary license stickers for issuance by the county
treasurer at no cost to the counties. The department may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations regarding the design and issuance of
temporary license stickers.
(3)(a) The owner of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer bearing
organizational specialty license plates may make application to the
county treasurer to have such organizational specialty license plates
transferred to a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer other than the
motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer for which such license plates were
originally purchased if such motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is
owned by the owner of the organizational specialty license plates.
(b) The owner may have the unused portion of the organizational
specialty license plate fee credited to the other motor vehicle, trailer,
or semitrailer that which will bear the organizational specialty license
plates at the rate of eight and one-third percent per month for each full
month left in the registration period.
(c) Application for such transfer shall be accompanied by a fee of
-13-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
three dollars. Fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor
Vehicles Cash Fund.
Sec. 10. Section 60-3,104.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-3,104.02 (1) The department shall issue organizational specialty
license plates for any organization that which certifies that it meets
the requirements of this section. The department shall work with the
organization to design the license plates.
(2) The department shall make applications available pursuant to
section 60-3,104.01 for each type of organizational specialty license
plate when it is designed. The department shall not manufacture
organizational specialty license plates for an organization until the
department has received two hundred fifty prepaid applications for the
organizational specialty license plates designed for that organization.
The department may revoke the approval for an organizational
organization's specialty license plate if the total number of registered
vehicles that obtained such license plate is less than two hundred fifty
within three years after receiving approval.
(3) In order to have organizational specialty license plates
designed and manufactured, an organization shall furnish the department
with the following:
(a) A copy of its articles of incorporation and, if the organization
consists of a group of nonprofit corporations, a copy for each
organization;
(b) A copy of its charter or bylaws and, if the organization
consists of a group of nonprofit corporations, a copy for each
organization;
(c) Any Internal Revenue Service rulings of the organization's
nonprofit tax-exempt status and, if the organization consists of a group
of nonprofit corporations, a copy for each organization;
-14-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
(d) A copy of a certificate of existence on file with the Secretary
of State under the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act;
(e) Two hundred fifty prepaid applications for the alphanumeric
organizational specialty license plates; and
(f) A completed application for the issuance of the license plates
on a form provided by the department certifying that the organization
meets the following requirements:
(i) The organization is a nonprofit corporation or a group of
nonprofit corporations with a common purpose;
(ii) The primary activity or purpose of the organization serves the
community, contributes to the welfare of others, and is not offensive or
discriminatory in its purpose, nature, activity, or name;
(iii) The name and purpose of the organization does not promote any
specific product or brand name that is on a product provided for sale;
(iv) The organization is authorized to use any name, logo, or
graphic design suggested for the design of the license plates;
(v) No infringement or violation of any property right will result
from such use of such name, logo, or graphic design; and
(vi) The organization will hold harmless the State of Nebraska and
its employees and agents for any liability that which may result from any
infringement or violation of a property right based on the use of such
name, logo, or graphic design.
(4)(a) One type of license plate under this section shall be
alphanumeric license plates. The department shall assign a designation up
to five characters and not use a county designation.
(b) One type of license plate under this section shall be
personalized message license plates. Such license plates shall be issued
subject to the same conditions specified for personalized message license
plates in section 60-3,118, except that a maximum of five characters may
be used. Personalized message organizational specialty license plates
under this section shall only be issued after the requirements of
-15-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
subsection (3) of this section have been met.
(5) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
Sec. 11. Section 60-3,129, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,129 (1) The Spirit Plate Proceeds Fund is created. The fund
shall consist of money credited to the fund pursuant to section 15 of
this act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) If the cost of manufacturing Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates
at any time exceeds the amount charged for license plates pursuant to
section 60-3,102, any money to be credited to the Spirit Plate Proceeds
Fund shall instead be credited first to the Highway Trust Fund in an
amount equal to the difference between the manufacturing costs of such
spirit plates and the amount charged pursuant to such section with
respect to such spirit plates and the remainder shall be credited to the
Spirit Plate Proceeds Fund as provided in section 60-3,128.
(2) (3) The first three million dollars credited to the Spirit Plate
Proceeds Fund and not credited to the Highway Trust Fund shall be
appropriated to the University of Nebraska to establish an endowment fund
to provide financial support to former University of Nebraska athletes to
pursue undergraduate and postgraduate studies at any University of
Nebraska campus. Funds appropriated by the Legislature for such
scholarship program shall be held, managed, and invested as an endowed
scholarship fund in such manner as the Board of Regents of the University
of Nebraska shall determine and as authorized by section 72-1246. The
income from the endowed scholarship fund shall be expended for such
scholarships. The University of Nebraska shall grant financial support to
former athletes who demonstrate financial need as determined by the
Federal Pell Grant Program or similar need-based qualifications as
-16-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
approved by the financial aid office of the appropriate campus.
(3) (4) The next two million dollars credited to the Spirit Plate
Proceeds Fund and not credited to the Highway Trust Fund shall be
appropriated to the University of Nebraska to establish an endowment fund
to provide financial support for the academic service units of the
athletic departments of the campuses of the University of Nebraska in
support of academic services to athletes.
Sec. 12. Section 60-3,130.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
60-3,130.04 (1) An owner of a historical vehicle eligible for
registration under section 60-3,130 may use a license plate or plates
designed by this state in the year corresponding to the model year when
the vehicle was manufactured in lieu of the license plates designed
pursuant to section 60-3,130.03 subject to the approval of the
department. The department shall inspect the license plate or plates and
may approve the license plate or plates if it is determined that the
model-year license plate or plates are legible and serviceable and that
the license plate numbers do not conflict with or duplicate other numbers
assigned and in use. An original-issued license plate or plates that have
been restored to original condition may be used when approved by the
department.
(2) The department may consult with a recognized car club in
determining whether the year of the license plate or plates to be used
corresponds to the model year when the vehicle was manufactured.
(3) If only one license plate is used on the vehicle, the license
plate shall be placed on the rear of the vehicle. The owner of a
historical vehicle may use only one plate on the vehicle even for years
in which two license plates were issued for vehicles in general.
(4) License plates used pursuant to this section corresponding to
the year of manufacture of the vehicle shall not be personalized message
license plates, Pearl Harbor license plates, prisoner-of-war license
-17-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
plates, disabled veteran license plates, Purple Heart license plates,
amateur radio station license plates, Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates,
Nebraska History Plates, handicapped or disabled person license plates,
organizational specialty license plates, special interest motor vehicle
license plates, Military Honor Plates, or alternate license plates
Nebraska 150 Sesquicentennial Plates, Breast Cancer Awareness Plates,
Prostate Cancer Awareness Plates, Mountain Lion Conservation Plates,
Choose Life License Plates, Czech Heritage Plates, Donate Life Plates,
Down Syndrome Awareness Plates, Native American Cultural Awareness and
History Plates, Sammy's Superheroes license plates for childhood cancer
awareness, Wildlife Conservation Plates, Pets for Vets Plates, Support
the Arts Plates, Support Our Troops Plates, The Good Life Is Outside
Plates, or Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Plates.
Sec. 13. Section 60-3,253, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,253 Unless otherwise specified in section 15 of this act, the
following provisions apply to alternate license plates:
(1) The department shall design license plates to be known as
alternate license plates The Good Life Is Outside Plates. The design
specifications of each type of alternate license plate are indicated in
section 15 of this act shall reflect the importance of safe walking and
biking in Nebraska and the value of our recreational trails. The design
for each type of alternate license plate shall be selected on the basis
of limiting the manufacturing cost of each license plate to an amount
less than or equal to the amount charged for license plates pursuant to
section 60-3,102.
(2) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section and sections 14 and 15 of this act section
60-3,254.
(3)(a) Each (2) One type of alternate license plate The Good Life Is
Outside Plates shall be issued as either an alphanumeric alternate
-18-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
license plate or a personalized message alternate license plate plates.
(b) For an alphanumeric alternate license plate, the The department
shall:
(i) (a) Assign a designation up to five characters; and
(ii) (b) Not use a county designation.
(c) Personalized message alternate license plates (3) One type of
The Good Life Is Outside Plates shall be personalized message plates.
Such plates shall be issued subject to the same conditions specified for
personalized message license plates in section 60-3,118, except that a
maximum of five characters may be used.
(4) The department shall cease to issue a type of alternate license
plate listed in section 15 of this act The Good Life Is Outside Plates
beginning with the next license plate issuance cycle after the license
plate issuance cycle that begins in 2023 pursuant to section 60-3,101
after the first year that such type of alternate license plate was issued
by the department if the total number of registered vehicles that
obtained such type of alternate license plate plates is less than five
hundred per year within any prior consecutive two-year period.
Sec. 14. Section 60-3,254, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3,254 Unless otherwise specified in section 15 of this act, the
following provisions apply to alternate license plates:
(1) A person may apply to the department for alternate license
plates The Good Life Is Outside Plates in lieu of regular license plates
on an application prescribed and provided by the department for any motor
vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, except for a motor vehicle, trailer, or
semitrailer registered under section 60-3,198. An applicant receiving
alternate license plates a The Good Life Is Outside Plate for a farm
truck with a gross weight of over sixteen tons or for a commercial motor
vehicle registered for a gross weight of five tons or over shall affix
the appropriate tonnage decal to the license plate. The department shall
-19-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
make forms available for such applications through the county treasurers.
The alternate license plates shall be issued upon payment of the
alternate license plate fee described in subdivision subsection (2) of
this section.
(2)(a) In addition to all other fees required for registration under
the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, each application for initial issuance
or renewal of alphanumeric alternate license plates The Good Life Is
Outside Plates shall be accompanied by a fee of five dollars. County
treasurers collecting fees pursuant to this subdivision shall remit such
fees to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit five
dollars of the fee to the designated recipient of the alternate license
plate fee pursuant to section 15 of this act Game and Parks State Park
Improvement and Maintenance Fund for the purpose of trail improvement and
maintenance.
(b) In addition to all other fees required for registration under
the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, each application for initial issuance
or renewal of personalized message alternate license plates The Good Life
Is Outside Plates shall be accompanied by the personalized message
alternate license plate a fee of forty dollars. County treasurers
collecting fees pursuant to this subdivision shall remit such fees to the
State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit twenty-five percent of
the fee for initial issuance and renewal of such plates to the Department
of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund and seventy-five percent of the fee to the
designated recipient of the alternate license plate fee pursuant to
section 15 of this act Game and Parks State Park Improvement and
Maintenance Fund for the purpose of trail improvement and maintenance.
(3) When the department receives an application for alternate
license plates The Good Life Is Outside Plates, the department may
deliver the license plates and registration certificate to the applicant
by United States mail or to the county treasurer of the county where in
which the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is registered and the
-20-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
delivery of the license plates and registration certificate shall be made
through a secure process and system. If Beginning on an implementation
date designated by the director on or before January 1, 2022, if delivery
of the license plates and registration certificate is made by the
department to the applicant, the department may charge a postage and
handling fee in an amount not more than necessary to recover the cost of
postage and handling for the specific items mailed to the registrant. The
department shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. The county treasurer or the
department shall issue the specified alternate license plates The Good
Life Is Outside Plates in lieu of regular license plates when the
applicant complies with the other provisions of the Motor Vehicle
Registration Act for registration of the motor vehicle, trailer, or
semitrailer. If an alternate license plate is The Good Life Is Outside
Plates are lost, stolen, or mutilated, the licensee shall be issued a
replacement license plate plates upon request pursuant to section
60-3,157.
(4) The county treasurer or the department may issue temporary
license stickers to the applicant under this section for the applicant to
lawfully operate the vehicle pending receipt of the license plates. No
charge in addition to the registration fee shall be made for the issuance
of a temporary license sticker under this subsection. The department
shall furnish temporary license stickers for issuance by the county
treasurer at no cost to the counties. The department may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations regarding the design and issuance of
temporary license stickers.
(5) The owner of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer bearing
alternate license plates The Good Life Is Outside Plates may apply to the
county treasurer to have such license plates transferred to a motor
vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer other than the motor vehicle, trailer,
or semitrailer for which such license plates were originally purchased if
-21-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
such motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is owned by the owner of the
license plates. The owner may have the unused portion of the fee for the
license plates credited to the other motor vehicle, trailer, or
semitrailer that which will bear the license plates at the rate of eight
and one-third percent per month for each full month left in the
registration period. Application for such transfer shall be accompanied
by a fee of three dollars. Fees collected pursuant to this subsection
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of
Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.
(6) If the cost of manufacturing a type of alternate license plate
The Good Life Is Outside Plates at any time exceeds the amount charged
for license plates pursuant to section 60-3,102, any money to be credited
to the designated recipient of the alternate license plate fee pursuant
to section 15 of this act Game and Parks State Park Improvement and
Maintenance Fund shall instead be credited first to the Highway Trust
Fund in an amount equal to the difference between the manufacturing cost
of such type of alternate license plate costs of The Good Life Is Outside
Plates and the amount charged pursuant to section 60-3,102 with respect
to such license plates and the remainder shall be credited to the
designated recipient of the alternate license plate fee pursuant to
section 15 of this act Game and Parks State Park Improvement and
Maintenance Fund for the purpose of trail improvement and maintenance.
Sec. 15. The department shall issue the following types of
alternate license plates pursuant to this section, section 60-3,104, and
sections 13 and 14 of this act:
(1) Arbor Day Plates. The department shall design such license
plates in consultation with the Nebraska Statewide Arboretum and a
nonprofit organization holding a certificate of exemption under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code with a mission to inspire people
to plant, nurture, and celebrate trees. The design of such plates shall
represent the history and importance of Arbor Day in Nebraska. The
-22-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Arbor Day
Plates is the Home of Arbor Day Plate Cash Fund;
(2) Breast Cancer Awareness Plates. The department shall design such
license plates to include a pink ribbon and the words "early detection
saves lives" along the bottom of the license plate. The designated
recipient for alternate license plate fees for Breast Cancer Awareness
Plates is the University of Nebraska Medical Center for the breast cancer
navigator program;
(3) Choose Life License Plates. The department shall design such
license plates to reflect support for the protection of Nebraska's
children. The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for
Choose Life License Plates is the Health and Human Services Cash Fund to
supplement federal funds available to the Department of Health and Human
Services for the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, 42
U.S.C. 601, et seq.;
(4) Czech Heritage Plates. The department, in consultation with the
Czech Honorary Consul of Nebraska, shall design such license plates to
reflect Czech heritage in Nebraska. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for alternate license plate fees for Czech
Heritage Plates is the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund;
(5) Donate Life Plates. The department shall design such license
plates to reflect support for organ and tissue donation, registration as
a donor on the Donor Registry of Nebraska, and the federally designated
organ procurement organization for Nebraska. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Donate Life Plates is the Organ and
Tissue Donor Awareness and Education Fund;
(6) Down Syndrome Awareness Plates. The department shall design such
license plates to include the words "Down syndrome awareness" inside a
heart-shaped yellow and blue ribbon. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Down Syndrome Awareness Plates is the
University of Nebraska Medical Center for the Down Syndrome Clinic;
-23-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
(7) Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Plates. The department shall
design such license plates to include a blue background with the head of
an otter surfacing above water surrounded by the words "Josh the Otter-Be
Safe Around Water". The designated recipient for alternate license plate
fees for Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Plates is the Josh the
Otter-Be Safe Around Water Cash Fund;
(8) Mountain Lion Conservation Plates. The department shall design
such license plates to reflect support for the conservation of the
mountain lion population. The designated recipient for alternate license
plate fees for Mountain Lion Conservation Plates is the Game and Parks
Commission Educational Fund;
(9) Native American Cultural Awareness and History Plates. The
department, in consultation with the Commission on Indian Affairs, shall
design license plates that reflect the unique culture and history of
Native American tribes historically and currently located in Nebraska.
The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Native
American Cultural Awareness and History Plates is the Native American
Scholarship and Leadership Fund;
(10)(a) Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates. The department shall
design such license plates to (i) include the word "Cornhuskers" or
"Huskers" prominently in the design, (ii) use scarlet and cream colors in
the design or such other similar colors as the department determines to
best represent the official team colors of the University of Nebraska
Cornhuskers athletic programs and to provide suitable reflection and
contrast, (iii) use cream or a similar color for the background of the
design and scarlet or a similar color for the printing, and (iv) create a
design reflecting support for the University of Nebraska Cornhuskers
athletic programs in consultation with the University of Nebraska-Lincoln
Athletic Department.
(b) Alphanumeric Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates shall (i) be
consecutively numbered beginning with the number one and use numbers that
-24-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
are a size that maximizes legibility, and (ii) not use a county
designation or any characters other than numbers on the spirit plates.
(c) Personalized message Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates shall be
issued subject to the same conditions specified for message license
plates in subsection (2) of section 60-3,118. The characters used shall
consist only of letters, numerals, or a combination of letters and
numerals of the same size and design specified in section 60-3,100. A
maximum of seven characters may be used.
(d) Each application for initial issuance or renewal of Nebraska
Cornhusker Spirit Plates shall be accompanied by a fee of seventy
dollars. Fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit sixty percent of
the fee to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund and forty percent
of the fee to the designated recipient for alternate license plate fees.
(e) The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for
Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates is the Spirit Plate Proceeds Fund;
(11) Nebraska History Plates. The department shall design such
license plates in consultation with the Nebraska State Historical Society
to reflect the importance of historical preservation in Nebraska and the
value of our shared Nebraska history. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Nebraska History Plates is the Support
Nebraska History Cash Fund;
(12) Pets for Vets Plates. The department shall design such license
plates to support veterans and companion or therapy pet animals. The
designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Pets for Vets
Plates is the Pets for Vets Cash Fund;
(13) Prostate Cancer Awareness Plates. The department shall design
such license plates to include a light blue ribbon and the words "early
detection saves lives" along the bottom of the license plate. The
designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Prostate Cancer
Awareness Plates is the University of Nebraska Medical Center for the
-25-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
Nebraska Prostate Cancer Research Program;
(14) Sammy's Superheroes license plates for childhood cancer
awareness. The department shall design such license plates to include a
blue handprint over a yellow ribbon and the words "childhood cancer
awareness". The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for
Sammy's Superheroes license plates for childhood cancer awareness is the
University of Nebraska Medical Center for pediatric cancer research;
(15) Support the Arts Plates. The department shall design such
license plates in consultation with the Nebraska Arts Council to reflect
support for the arts in Nebraska. The designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Support the Arts Plates is the Support the Arts
Cash Fund;
(16)(a) Support Our Troops Plates. The department shall design such
license plates to reflect support for troops from all branches of the
armed forces. The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees
for Support Our Troops Plates is the Veterans Employment Program Fund.
(b)(i) Each application for initial issuance or renewal of
alphanumeric Support Our Troops Plates shall be accompanied by a fee of
five dollars. The State Treasurer shall credit five dollars of the fee to
the designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Support Our
Troops Plates.
(ii) Each application for initial issuance or renewal of
personalized message Support Our Troops Plates shall be accompanied by a
fee of seventy dollars. Twenty-five percent of such fee shall be credited
to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund and seventy-five percent of
such fee shall be credited to the designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Support Our Troops Plates;
(17) The Good Life Is Outside Plates. The department shall design
such license plates to reflect the importance of safe walking and biking
in Nebraska and the value of our recreational trails. The designated
recipient for alternate license plate fees for The Good Life Is Outside
-26-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
Plates is the Game and Parks State Park Improvement and Maintenance Fund
for the purpose of trail improvement and maintenance; and
(18) Wildlife Conservation Plates. The department shall create no
more than three designs for such license plates to reflect support for
the conservation of Nebraska wildlife, including sandhill cranes, bighorn
sheep, and ornate box turtles. The designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Wildlife Conservation Plates is the Wildlife
Conservation Fund.
Sec. 16. Section 60-495, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-495 (1) The director may adopt and promulgate such rules and
regulations necessary to carry out sections 60-493 to 60-495 and the
duties of the department under the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act.
The director shall prepare and furnish all forms and information
necessary under the act.
(2) The Organ and Tissue Donor Awareness and Education Fund is
created. Department personnel and the county treasurer shall remit all
funds contributed under sections 60-484, 60-4,144, and 60-4,181 to the
State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall also include any
money credited to the fund pursuant to section 15 of this act 60-3,246.
The Department of Health and Human Services shall administer the Organ
and Tissue Donor Awareness and Education Fund for the promotion of organ
and tissue donation. The department shall use the fund to assist
organizations such as the federally designated organ procurement
organization for Nebraska and the State Anatomical Board in carrying out
activities that which promote organ and tissue donation through the
creation and dissemination of educational information. Any money in the
fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 17. Section 80-415, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-27-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
amended to read:
80-415 The Veterans Employment Program Fund is created. The fund
shall consist of money credited pursuant to section 15 of this act
60-3,244 and any other money as appropriated by the Legislature. The fund
shall be administered by the Department of Veterans' Affairs, which shall
use the fund for recruiting and education to attract veterans recently
released from service to live and work in Nebraska, including the
development and implementation of a website as required by section
48-203. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 18. Section 80-416, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
80-416 The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall create a program
for the purpose of providing financial support to veterans for the costs
associated with adopting a pet animal. The department shall use the money
credited to the Pets for Vets Cash Fund under section 15 of this act
60-3,250 to award grants to carry out the purposes of such program. The
department may administer the program or contract with an organization
dedicated to the care of dogs and cats to administer the program.
Sec. 19. Section 80-417, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
80-417 The Pets for Vets Cash Fund is created for the purpose of
administering the veteran grant program created under section 80-416. The
fund shall consist of money credited to the fund pursuant to section 15
of this act 60-3,250. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
Sec. 20. Section 81-2517, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-28-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
81-2517 The Native American Scholarship and Leadership Fund is
created. The fund shall be administered by the Commission on Indian
Affairs and shall consist of money credited to the fund pursuant to
section 15 of this act 60-3,235. The commission shall use the fund to
provide scholarships to Native Americans to attend a postsecondary
educational institution in this state and to provide other leadership
opportunities to Native Americans as determined by the commission. Any
money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 21. Section 82-139, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
82-139 The Support Nebraska History Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall consist of money credited to the fund under section 15 of this act
60-3,256 and any other gifts, bequests, grants, or other contributions or
donations to the fund from public or private entities. The Nebraska State
Historical Society shall administer and distribute the Support Nebraska
History Cash Fund. The fund shall be expended to promote the history of
Nebraska on the Internet, to support history education for children in
Nebraska, and for costs directly related to the administration of the
fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 22. Section 82-334, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
82-334 (1) The Support the Arts Cash Fund is created. The fund shall
consist of all money credited to the fund pursuant to section 15 of this
act 60-3,252 and all money transferred to the fund pursuant to section
13-3108.
(2) The Nebraska Arts Council shall administer and distribute the
Support the Arts Cash Fund. The fund shall be expended by the Nebraska
-29-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
Arts Council (a) to provide aid to communities that designate a focus
area of the city or village for arts and cultural development, (b) to
provide money for a competitive grant program that awards a grant to any
creative district that meets the criteria for the competitive grant, if
such program exists, (c) to provide money for the competitive grant
program for cities of the first class, cities of the second class, and
villages described in section 82-335, and (d) to defray costs directly
related to the administration of the fund.
(3) All money transferred to the fund pursuant to section 13-3108
shall be used for the competitive grant program for cities of the first
class, cities of the second class, and villages described in section
82-335.
(4) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 23. (1) The Home of Arbor Day Plate Cash Fund is created and
shall be administered by the Board of Regents of the University of
Nebraska. The Home of Arbor Day Plate Cash Fund shall include money
credited pursuant to section 15 of this act, gifts, grants, private
contributions, and other sources. Any money in the Home of Arbor Day
Plate Cash Fund shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act.
(2) The University of Nebraska Board of Regents shall use the fund
to award grants to the Nebraska Statewide Arboretum, for purposes of tree
planting, garden making, community building, and environmental education
and outreach.
Sec. 24. Original sections 37-327.04, 60-3,104.01, 60-3,104.02,
60-3,129, 60-3,254, 60-495, 80-415, 80-416, 80-417, 81-2517, 82-139, and
82-334, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 37-112,
37-811, 60-301, 60-393, 60-395, 60-396, 60-3,104, 60-3,130.04, and
-30-

LB568 LB568
2025 2025
60-3,253, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 25. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
60-3,127, 60-3,223, 60-3,224, 60-3,225, 60-3,227, 60-3,230, 60-3,231,
60-3,234, 60-3,235, 60-3,238, 60-3,239, 60-3,240, 60-3,242, 60-3,244,
60-3,246, 60-3,248, 60-3,250, 60-3,252, 60-3,255, 60-3,256, 60-3,257, and
60-3,258, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 60-3,128,
60-3,226, 60-3,232, 60-3,233, 60-3,237, 60-3,241, 60-3,243, 60-3,245,
60-3,247, 60-3,249, 60-3,251, 60-3,259, and 60-3,260, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024.
-31-